Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 13 Trade Practices and Frauds

Cross references. —

As to discrimination, etc., in connection with trade and commerce generally, see §§

40-4-101

through

40-4-123

.

Reasonable to restrict use of non-OEM parts. —

Promulgation of a regulation prohibiting use by an insurer of non-OEM (original equipment manufacturer) parts in the repair or estimate of repair without written consent of the insured was a reasonable exercise of the authority given to the commissioner by this chapter, and set forth a reasonable requirement furthering the purpose of this title, i.e., to assure fair and equitable insurance transactions. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 35 to 48.

Insurer's statements as to amount of dividends, accumulations, surplus or the like as binding on insurer or merely illustrative, 17 ALR3d 777.

Waiver or estoppel on basis of statements in promotional or explanatory literature issued to insureds, 36 ALR3d 541.

Doctrine of unconscionability as applied to insurance contracts, 86 ALR3d 862.

What constitutes bad faith on part of insurer rendering it liable for statutory penalty imposed for bad faith in failure to pay, or delay in paying, insured's claim, 33 ALR4th 579.

Insurer's tort liability for wrongful or negligent issuance of life policy, 37 ALR4th 972.

Liability of independent or public insurance adjuster to insured for conduct in adjusting claim, 50 ALR4th 900.

Duty of insurer to pay for independent counsel when conflict of interest exists between insured and insurer, 50 ALR4th 932.